Maryland, session 2026, HB0253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
24–113.3.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, the Secretary, by regulation,
may determine that a vehicle or combination of vehicles transporting manifested
international freight as the only load of the vehicle or combination of vehicles in a sealed,
seagoing container on a semitrailer is transporting an indivisible load, provided that the
vehicle or combination of vehicles is issued a permit under this section and:
(1) Is carrying not more than 100,000 pounds gross maximum vehicle
weight;
(2) Has the minimum number of axles required by the permit;
(3) Does not exceed the maximum axle weight or axle spacing
requirements, as established by regulation or specified on the permit;
(4) Is traveling only during the hours as established by regulation or
specified on the permit;
(5) Adheres to a unique maximum speed limit specified on the permit; and
(6) Is traveling only on State or county highways that are[:
– 1 –

Ch. 120 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) On] ON the specific route established by regulation and specified
IDENTIFIED on the permit between the Seagirt Marine Terminal and a destination
authorized by the Secretary, with no deviation from the specific route[; and
(ii) Specifically designated by the Secretary as being part of a “heavy
weight port corridor”].
(b) (1) The Secretary shall adopt regulations, consistent with this section, for
the issuance of permits for vehicles described under subsection (a) of this section.
(2) The regulations adopted under this subsection:
(i) May set permit fees; [and]
(ii) Shall establish axle and gross weight requirements, routes, and
other necessary criteria; AND
(III) SHALL ESTABLISH THE DESTINATIONS TO WHICH A
VEHICLE OR COMBINATION OF VEHICLES MAY TRAVEL FROM THE SEAGIRT MARINE
TERMINAL UNDER A PERMIT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 2 –